Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.090

Illegal votes—Allegation of.

When the reception of illegal votes is alleged as a cause of contest, it is sufficient to state generally that illegal votes were cast, that, if given to the person whose election is contested, or to the winning choice for a measure, in the specified precinct or precincts, will, if taken from that person, or winning choice for a measure, reduce the number of the person's legal votes below the number of legal votes given to some other person for the same office or reverse the outcome of the measure.

[ 2016 c 130 s 8; 2003 c 111 s 1709; 1965 c 9 s 29.65.080. Prior: Code 1881 s 3111, part; 1865 p 44 s 7, part; RRS s 5372, part. Formerly RCW 29.65.080.]